Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-217
Beatrice State Developmental Center; designation.

The Nebraska institution for children with mental retardation and adults requiring residential care shall be known and designated as the Beatrice State Developmental Center.

Laws 1885, c. 52, § 1, p. 255;

R.S.1913, § 7220;

Laws 1921, c. 241, § 1, p. 843;

C.S.1922, § 6878;

C.S.1929, § 83-401;

R.S.1943, § 83-217;

Laws 1967, c. 251, § 4, p. 663;

Laws 1969, c. 816, § 13, p. 3068;

Laws 1976, LB 974, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 1177, § 44.

Administration of Beatrice State Developmental Center, see section 83-1209.

Rights of persons admitted, see sections 83-381 to 83-390.